Nebraska, session 109, LB1169.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB1169 LB1169
2026 2026
Section 1. Section 28-101, Revised Statutes Supplement, 2025, is
amended to read:
28-101 Sections 28-101 to 28-1357, 28-1601 to 28-1603, and 28-1701
and sections 3 to 7 of this act shall be known and may be cited as the
Nebraska Criminal Code.
Sec. 2. Section 28-115, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
28-115 (1) Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, any
person who commits any of the following criminal offenses against a
pregnant woman shall be punished by the imposition of the next higher
penalty classification than the penalty classification prescribed for the
criminal offense:
(a) Assault in the first degree, section 28-308;
(b) Assault in the second degree, section 28-309;
(c) Assault in the third degree, section 28-310;
(d) Assault by strangulation or suffocation, section 28-310.01;
(e) Sexual assault in the first degree, section 28-319;
(f) Sexual assault in the second or third degree, section 28-320;
(g) Sexual assault of a child in the first degree, section
28-319.01;
(h) Sexual assault of a child in the second or third degree, section
28-320.01;
(i) Sexual abuse of an inmate or parolee in the first degree,
section 28-322.02;
(j) Sexual abuse of an inmate or parolee in the second degree,
section 28-322.03;
(k) Sexual abuse of a protected individual in the first or second
degree, section 28-322.04;
(l) Sexual abuse of a detainee under section 28-322.05;
(m) Domestic assault in the first, second, or third degree, section
28-323;
-2-

LB1169 LB1169
2026 2026
(n) Assault on a public safety officer or health care professional
in the first degree, section 4 of this act; an officer, an emergency
responder, a state correctional employee, a Department of Health and
Human Services employee, or a health care professional in the first
degree, section 28-929;
(o) Assault on a public safety officer or health care professional
in the second degree, section 5 of this act; an officer, an emergency
responder, a state correctional employee, a Department of Health and
Human Services employee, or a health care professional in the second
degree, section 28-930;
(p) Assault on a public safety officer or health care professional
in the third degree, section 6 of this act; an officer, an emergency
responder, a state correctional employee, a Department of Health and
Human Services employee, or a health care professional in the third
degree, section 28-931;
(q) Assault on an officer, an emergency responder, a state
correctional employee, a Department of Health and Human Services
employee, or a health care professional using a motor vehicle, section
28-931.01;
(q) (r) Assault by a confined person, section 28-932;
(r) (s) Confined person committing offenses against another person,
section 28-933; and
(s) (t) Proximately causing serious bodily injury while operating a
motor vehicle, section 60-6,198.
(2) The enhancement in subsection (1) of this section does not apply
to any criminal offense listed in subsection (1) of this section that is
already punishable as a Class I, IA, or IB felony. If any criminal
offense listed in subsection (1) of this section is punishable as a Class
I misdemeanor, the penalty under this section is a Class IIIA felony.
(3) The prosecution shall allege and prove beyond a reasonable doubt
that the victim was pregnant at the time of the offense.
-3-

LB1169 LB1169
2026 2026
Sec. 3. Section 28-929.01, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
28-929.01 For purposes of sections 3 to 7 of this act 28-929,
28-929.02, 28-930, 28-931, and 28-931.01:
(1) Court operations officer means any non-sworn person employed by
a county, court, or judicial district whose primary responsibility
includes physical interaction with the public to:
(a) Provide security screening at entrances to courthouses, judicial
facilities, or other buildings housing judicial operations;
(b) Serve civil process, writs, orders, or protection orders on
behalf of a court; or
(c) Maintain security and safety within courthouses, judicial
facilities, or during judicial proceedings;
(2) (1) Emergency care provider means (a) an emergency medical
responder; (b) an emergency medical technician; (c) an advanced emergency
medical technician; (d) a community paramedic; (e) a critical care
paramedic; or (f) a paramedic, as those persons are licensed and
classified under the Emergency Medical Services Practice Act;
(3) (2) Health care professional means a physician or other health
care practitioner who is licensed, certified, or registered to perform
specified health services consistent with state law who practices at a
hospital or a health clinic;
(4) (3) Health clinic has the definition found in section 71-416;
and
(5) (4) Hospital has the definition found in section 71-419; and .
(6) Public safety officer means:
(a) A peace officer;
(b) A probation officer;
(c) A court operations officer;
(d) A firefighter;
(e) An emergency care provider;
-4-

LB1169 LB1169
2026 2026
(f) An employee of the Department of Correctional Services; or
(g) An employee of the Department of Health and Human Services if
the person committing the offense is committed as a dangerous sex
offender under the Sex Offender Commitment Act.
Sec. 4. Section 28-929, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
28-929 (1) A person commits the offense of assault on an officer, an
emergency responder, a state correctional employee, a Department of
Health and Human Services employee, or a public safety officer or health
care professional in the first degree if such person intentionally or
knowingly causes serious bodily injury to a:
(a) Public safety officer while such officer is engaged in the
performance of the officer's official duties; or
(b) Health care professional while such professional is on duty at a
hospital or health clinic.
(a) He or she intentionally or knowingly causes serious bodily
injury:
(i) To a peace officer, a probation officer, a firefighter, an
emergency care provider, or an employee of the Department of Correctional
Services;
(ii) To an employee of the Department of Health and Human Services
if the person committing the offense is committed as a dangerous sex
offender under the Sex Offender Commitment Act; or
(iii) To a health care professional; and
(b) The offense is committed while such officer, firefighter,
emergency care provider, or employee is engaged in the performance of his
or her official duties or while the health care professional is on duty
at a hospital or a health clinic.
(2) A violation of this section is Assault on an officer, an
emergency responder, a state correctional employee, a Department of
Health and Human Services employee, or a health care professional in the
-5-

LB1169 LB1169
2026 2026
first degree shall be a Class ID felony.
Sec. 5. Section 28-930, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
28-930 (1) A person commits the offense of assault on an officer, an
emergency responder, a state correctional employee, a Department of
Health and Human Services employee, or a public safety officer or health
care professional in the second degree if such person:
(a) Intentionally, knowingly, or recklessly causes bodily injury to
a public safety officer or health care professional with a dangerous
instrument; and
(b) Such offense is committed while such:
(i) Public safety officer is engaged in the performance of the
officer's official duties; or
(ii) Health care professional is on duty at a hospital or health
clinic.
(a) He or she:
(i) Intentionally or knowingly causes bodily injury with a dangerous
instrument:
(A) To a peace officer, a probation officer, a firefighter, an
emergency care provider, or an employee of the Department of Correctional
Services;
(B) To an employee of the Department of Health and Human Services if
the person committing the offense is committed as a dangerous sex
offender under the Sex Offender Commitment Act; or
(C) To a health care professional; or
(ii) Recklessly causes bodily injury with a dangerous instrument:
(A) To a peace officer, a probation officer, a firefighter, an
emergency care provider, or an employee of the Department of Correctional
Services;
(B) To an employee of the Department of Health and Human Services if
the person committing the offense is committed as a dangerous sex
-6-

LB1169 LB1169
2026 2026
offender under the Sex Offender Commitment Act; or
(C) To a health care professional; and
(b) The offense is committed while such officer, firefighter,
emergency care provider, or employee is engaged in the performance of his
or her official duties or while the health care professional is on duty
at a hospital or a health clinic.
(2) A violation of this section is Assault on an officer, an
emergency responder, a state correctional employee, a Department of
Health and Human Services employee, or a health care professional in the
second degree shall be a Class II felony.
Sec. 6. Section 28-931, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
28-931 (1) A person commits the offense of assault on an officer, an
emergency responder, a state correctional employee, a Department of
Health and Human Services employee, or a public safety officer or health
care professional in the third degree if such person intentionally,
knowingly, or recklessly causes bodily injury to a:
(a) Public safety officer while such officer is engaged in the
performance of the officer's official duties; or
(b) Health care professional while such professional is on duty at a
hospital or health clinic.
(a) He or she intentionally, knowingly, or recklessly causes bodily
injury:
(i) To a peace officer, a probation officer, a firefighter, an
emergency care provider, or an employee of the Department of Correctional
Services;
(ii) To an employee of the Department of Health and Human Services
if the person committing the offense is committed as a dangerous sex
offender under the Sex Offender Commitment Act; or
(iii) To a health care professional; and
(b) The offense is committed while such officer, firefighter,
-7-

LB1169 LB1169
2026 2026
emergency care provider, or employee is engaged in the performance of his
or her official duties or while the health care professional is on duty
at a hospital or a health clinic.
(2) A violation of this section is Assault on an officer, an
emergency responder, a state correctional employee, a Department of
Health and Human Services employee, or a health care professional in the
third degree shall be a Class IIIA felony.
Sec. 7. Section 28-934, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
28-934 (1) A person commits an offense if such person:
(a) Knowingly or intentionally strikes a public safety officer or
health care professional with a bodily fluid; and
(b) Such offense is committed while such:
(i) Public safety officer is engaged in the performance of the
officer's official duties; or
(ii) Health care professional is on duty at a hospital or health
clinic.
(1) Any person who knowingly and intentionally strikes any public
safety officer with any bodily fluid is guilty of assault with a bodily
fluid against a public safety officer.
(2) Except as provided in subsection (3) of this section, a
violation of this section assault with a bodily fluid against a public
safety officer is a Class I misdemeanor.
(3) A violation of this section Assault with a bodily fluid against
a public safety officer is a Class IIIA felony if the person committing
the offense strikes with a bodily fluid the eyes, mouth, or skin of a
public safety officer or health care professional and knew the source of
the bodily fluid was infected with the human immunodeficiency virus,
hepatitis B, or hepatitis C at the time the offense was committed.
(4) Upon a showing of probable cause by affidavit to a judge of this
state that an offense under as defined in subsection (1) of this section
-8-

LB1169 LB1169
2026 2026
has been committed and that identifies the probable source of the bodily
fluid or bodily fluids used to commit the offense, the judge shall grant
an order or issue a search warrant authorizing the collection of any
evidence, including any bodily fluid or medical records or the
performance of any medical or scientific testing or analysis, that may
assist with the determination of whether or not the person committing the
offense or the person from whom the person committing the offense
obtained the bodily fluid or bodily fluids is infected with the human
immunodeficiency virus, hepatitis B, or hepatitis C.
(5) As used in this section:
(a) Bodily fluid means any naturally produced secretion or waste
product generated by the human body and shall include, but not be limited
to, any quantity of human blood, urine, saliva, mucus, vomitus, seminal
fluid, or feces; and
(b) Public safety officer has the same meaning as in section 3 of
this act, but as used in this section, also includes an employee of a:
includes any of the following persons who are engaged in the performance
of their official duties at the time of the offense: A peace officer; a
probation officer; a firefighter; an emergency care provider as defined
in section 28-929.01; a health care professional as defined in section
28-929.01; an employee of a county,
(i) County, city, or village jail; an employee of the Department of
Correctional Services; an employee of the secure
(ii) Secure youth confinement facility operated by the Department of
Correctional Services, if the person committing the offense is committed
to such facility; or
(iii) Youth rehabilitation and treatment center. an employee of a
youth rehabilitation and treatment center; or an employee of the
Department of Health and Human Services if the person committing the
offense is committed as a dangerous sex offender under the Sex Offender
Commitment Act.
-9-

LB1169 LB1169
2026 2026
Sec. 8. Section 28-929.02, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
28-929.02 Every hospital and health clinic shall display at all
times in a prominent place a printed sign with a minimum height of twenty
inches and a minimum width of fourteen inches, with each letter to be a
minimum of one-fourth inch in height, which shall read as follows:
WARNING: ASSAULTING A HEALTH CARE PROFESSIONAL WHO IS ENGAGED IN THE
PERFORMANCE OF HIS OR HER OFFICIAL DUTIES, INCLUDING STRIKING A HEALTH
CARE PROFESSIONAL WITH ANY BODILY FLUID, IS A SERIOUS CRIME WHICH MAY BE
PUNISHABLE AS A FELONY.
Sec. 9. Section 28-1351, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
28-1351 (1) A person commits the offense of unlawful membership
recruitment into an organization or association when he or she knowingly
and intentionally coerces, intimidates, threatens, or inflicts bodily
harm upon another person in order to entice that other person to join or
prevent that other person from leaving any organization, group,
enterprise, or association whose members, individually or collectively,
engage in or have engaged in any of the following criminal acts for the
benefit of, at the direction of, or on behalf of the organization, group,
enterprise, or association or any of its members:
(a) Robbery under section 28-324;
(b) Arson in the first, second, or third degree under section
28-502, 28-503, or 28-504, respectively;
(c) Burglary under section 28-507;
(d) Murder in the first degree, murder in the second degree, or
manslaughter under section 28-303, 28-304, or 28-305, respectively;
(e) Violations of the Uniform Controlled Substances Act that involve
possession with intent to deliver, distribution, delivery, or manufacture
of a controlled substance;
(f) Unlawful use, possession, or discharge of a firearm or other
-10-

LB1169 LB1169
2026 2026
deadly weapon under sections 28-1201 to 28-1212.04;
(g) Assault in the first degree or assault in the second degree
under section 28-308 or 28-309, respectively;
(h) Assault on an officer, an emergency responder, a state
correctional employee, a Department of Health and Human Services
employee, or a public safety officer or health care professional in the
first, second, or third degree under section 4, 5, or 6 of this act
28-929, 28-930, or 28-931, respectively , or assault on an officer, an
emergency responder, a state correctional employee, a Department of
Health and Human Services employee, or a health care professional using a
motor vehicle under section 28-931.01;
(i) Theft by unlawful taking or disposition under section 28-511;
(j) Theft by receiving stolen property under section 28-517;
(k) Theft by deception under section 28-512;
(l) Theft by extortion under section 28-513;
(m) Kidnapping under section 28-313;
(n) Any forgery offense under sections 28-602 to 28-605;
(o) Criminal impersonation under section 28-638;
(p) Tampering with a publicly exhibited contest under section
28-614;
(q) Unauthorized use of a financial transaction device or criminal
possession of a financial transaction device under section 28-620 or
28-621, respectively;
(r) Pandering under section 28-802;
(s) Bribery, bribery of a witness, or bribery of a juror under
section 28-917, 28-918, or 28-920, respectively;
(t) Tampering with a witness or an informant or jury tampering under
section 28-919;
(u) Unauthorized application of graffiti under section 28-524;
(v) Dogfighting, cockfighting, bearbaiting, or pitting an animal
against another under section 28-1005; or
-11-

LB1169 LB1169
2026 2026
(w) Promoting gambling in the first degree under section 28-1102.
(2) Unlawful membership recruitment into an organization or
association is a Class IV felony.
Sec. 10. Section 28-1354, Revised Statutes Supplement, 2025, is
amended to read:
28-1354 For purposes of the Public Protection Act:
(1) Enterprise means any individual, sole proprietorship,
partnership, corporation, trust, association, or any legal entity, union,
or group of individuals associated in fact although not a legal entity,
and shall include illicit as well as licit enterprises as well as other
entities;
(2) Pattern of racketeering activity means a cumulative loss for one
or more victims or gains for the enterprise of not less than one thousand
five hundred dollars resulting from at least two acts of racketeering
activity, one of which occurred after August 30, 2009, and the last of
which occurred within ten years, excluding any period of imprisonment,
after the commission of a prior act of racketeering activity;
(3) Until January 1, 2017, person means any individual or entity, as
defined in section 21-2014, holding or capable of holding a legal,
equitable, or beneficial interest in property. Beginning January 1, 2017,
person means any individual or entity, as defined in section 21-214,
holding or capable of holding a legal, equitable, or beneficial interest
in property;
(4) Prosecutor includes the Attorney General of the State of
Nebraska, the deputy attorney general, assistant attorneys general, a
county attorney, a deputy county attorney, or any person so designated by
the Attorney General, a county attorney, or a court of the state to carry
out the powers conferred by the act;
(5) Racketeering activity includes the commission of, criminal
attempt to commit, conspiracy to commit, aiding and abetting in the
commission of, aiding in the consummation of, acting as an accessory to
-12-

LB1169 LB1169
2026 2026
the commission of, or the solicitation, coercion, or intimidation of
another to commit or aid in the commission of any of the following:
(a) Offenses against the person which include: Murder in the first
degree under section 28-303; murder in the second degree under section
28-304; manslaughter under section 28-305; assault in the first degree
under section 28-308; assault in the second degree under section 28-309;
assault in the third degree under section 28-310; terroristic threats
under section 28-311.01; kidnapping under section 28-313; false
imprisonment in the first degree under section 28-314; false imprisonment
in the second degree under section 28-315; sexual assault in the first
degree under section 28-319; and robbery under section 28-324;
(b) Offenses relating to controlled substances which include: To
unlawfully manufacture, distribute, deliver, dispense, or possess with
intent to manufacture, distribute, deliver, or dispense a controlled
substance under subsection (1) of section 28-416; possession of marijuana
weighing more than one pound under subsection (12) of section 28-416;
possession of money used or intended to be used to facilitate a violation
of subsection (1) of section 28-416 prohibited under subsection (17) of
section 28-416; any violation of section 28-418; to unlawfully
manufacture, distribute, deliver, or possess with intent to distribute or
deliver an imitation controlled substance under section 28-445;
possession of anhydrous ammonia with the intent to manufacture
methamphetamine under section 28-451; and possession of ephedrine,
pseudoephedrine, or phenylpropanolamine with the intent to manufacture
methamphetamine under section 28-452;
(c) Offenses against property which include: Arson in the first
degree under section 28-502; arson in the second degree under section
28-503; arson in the third degree under section 28-504; burglary under
section 28-507; theft by unlawful taking or disposition under section
28-511; theft by shoplifting under section 28-511.01; theft by deception
under section 28-512; theft by extortion under section 28-513; theft of
-13-

LB1169 LB1169
2026 2026
services under section 28-515; theft by receiving stolen property under
section 28-517; criminal mischief under section 28-519; and unlawfully
depriving or obtaining property or services using a computer under
section 28-1344;
(d) Offenses involving fraud which include: Burning to defraud an
insurer under section 28-505; forgery in the first degree under section
28-602; forgery in the second degree under section 28-603; criminal
possession of a forged instrument under section 28-604; criminal
possession of written instrument forgery devices under section 28-605;
criminal impersonation under section 28-638; identity theft under section
28-639; identity fraud under section 28-640; false statement or book
entry under section 28-612; tampering with a publicly exhibited contest
under section 28-614; issuing a false financial statement for purposes of
obtaining a financial transaction device under section 28-619;
unauthorized use of a financial transaction device under section 28-620;
criminal possession of a financial transaction device under section
28-621; unlawful circulation of a financial transaction device in the
first degree under section 28-622; unlawful circulation of a financial
transaction device in the second degree under section 28-623; criminal
possession of a blank financial transaction device under section 28-624;
criminal sale of a blank financial transaction device under section
28-625; criminal possession of a financial transaction forgery device
under section 28-626; unlawful manufacture of a financial transaction
device under section 28-627; laundering of sales forms under section
28-628; unlawful acquisition of sales form processing services under
section 28-629; unlawful factoring of a financial transaction device
under section 28-630; and fraudulent insurance acts under section 28-631;
(e) Offenses involving governmental operations which include: Abuse
of public records under section 28-911; perjury or subornation of perjury
under section 28-915; bribery under section 28-917; bribery of a witness
under section 28-918; tampering with a witness or informant or jury
-14-

LB1169 LB1169
2026 2026
tampering under section 28-919; bribery of a juror under section 28-920;
assault on a public safety officer or health care professional in the
first, second, or third degree under section 4, 5, or 6 of this act;
assault on an officer, an emergency responder, a state correctional
employee, a Department of Health and Human Services employee, or a health
care professional in the first degree under section 28-929; assault on an
officer, an emergency responder, a state correctional employee, a
Department of Health and Human Services employee, or a health care
professional in the second degree under section 28-930; assault on an
officer, an emergency responder, a state correctional employee, a
Department of Health and Human Services employee, or a health care
professional in the third degree under section 28-931; and assault on an
officer, an emergency responder, a state correctional employee, a
Department of Health and Human Services employee, or a health care
professional using a motor vehicle under section 28-931.01;
(f) Offenses involving gambling which include: Promoting gambling in
the first degree under section 28-1102; possession of gambling records
under section 28-1105; gambling debt collection under section 28-1105.01;
and possession of a gambling device under section 28-1107;
(g) Offenses relating to firearms, weapons, and explosives which
include: Carrying a concealed weapon under section 28-1202;
transportation or possession of machine guns, short rifles, or short
shotguns under section 28-1203; unlawful possession of a handgun under
section 28-1204; unlawful transfer of a firearm to a juvenile under
section 28-1204.01; possession of a firearm by a prohibited juvenile
offender under section 28-1204.05; using a deadly weapon to commit a
felony, possession of a deadly weapon during the commission of a felony,
or carrying a firearm or destructive device during the commission of a
dangerous misdemeanor under section 28-1205; possession of a deadly
weapon by a prohibited person under section 28-1206; possession of a
defaced firearm under section 28-1207; defacing a firearm under section
-15-

LB1169 LB1169
2026 2026
28-1208; unlawful discharge of a firearm under section 28-1212.02;
possession, receipt, retention, or disposition of a stolen firearm under
section 28-1212.03; unlawful possession of explosive materials in the
first degree under section 28-1215; unlawful possession of explosive
materials in the second degree under section 28-1216; unlawful sale of
explosives under section 28-1217; use of explosives without a permit
under section 28-1218; obtaining an explosives permit through false
representations under section 28-1219; possession of a destructive device
under section 28-1220; threatening the use of explosives or placing a
false bomb under section 28-1221; using explosives to commit a felony
under section 28-1222; using explosives to damage or destroy property
under section 28-1223; and using explosives to kill or injure any person
under section 28-1224;
(h) Any violation of the Securities Act of Nebraska pursuant to
section 8-1117;
(i) Any violation of the Nebraska Revenue Act of 1967 pursuant to
section 77-2713;
(j) Offenses relating to public health and morals which include:
Prostitution under section 28-801; pandering under section 28-802;
keeping a place of prostitution under section 28-804; labor trafficking,
sex trafficking, labor trafficking of a minor, or sex trafficking of a
minor under section 28-831; a violation of section 28-1005; and any act
relating to the visual depiction of sexually explicit conduct prohibited
in the Child Sexual Abuse Material Prevention Act; and
(k) A violation of the Computer Crimes Act;
(6) State means the State of Nebraska or any political subdivision
or any department, agency, or instrumentality thereof; and
(7) Unlawful debt means a debt of at least one thousand five hundred
dollars:
(a) Incurred or contracted in gambling activity which was in
violation of federal law or the law of the state or which is
-16-

LB1169 LB1169
2026 2026
unenforceable under state or federal law in whole or in part as to
principal or interest because of the laws relating to usury; or
(b) Which was incurred in connection with the business of gambling
in violation of federal law or the law of the state or the business of
lending money or a thing of value at a rate usurious under state law if
the usurious rate is at least twice the enforceable rate.
Sec. 11. Section 29-2221, Revised Statutes Supplement, 2025, is
amended to read:
29-2221 (1) Whoever has been twice convicted of a crime, sentenced,
and committed to prison, in this or any other state or by the United
States or once in this state and once at least in any other state or by
the United States, for terms of not less than one year each shall, upon
conviction of a felony committed in this state, be deemed to be a
habitual criminal and shall be punished by imprisonment in a Department
of Correctional Services adult correctional facility for a mandatory
minimum term of ten years and a maximum term of not more than sixty
years, except that:
(a) If the felony committed is in violation of section 28-303,
28-304, 28-308, 28-313, 28-319, 28-319.01, 28-502, 28-929, or 28-1222 or
section 4 of this act, and at least one of the habitual criminal's prior
felony convictions was for a violation of one of the sections listed in
this subdivision or of a similar statute in another state or of the
United States, the mandatory minimum term shall be twenty-five years and
the maximum term not more than sixty years;
(b) If the felony committed is in violation of subsection (3) of
section 28-306 and at least one of the prior convictions is in violation
of subsection (3) of section 28-306 and the other is in violation of one
of the sections set forth in subdivision (a) of this subsection or if the
felony committed is in violation of one of the sections set forth in
subdivision (a) of this subsection and both of the prior convictions are
in violation of subsection (3) of section 28-306, the mandatory minimum
-17-

LB1169 LB1169
2026 2026
term shall be twenty-five years and the maximum term not more than sixty
years;
(c) If the felony committed is in violation of subsection (3) of
section 28-416 or in violation of sections 28-509 to 28-518 and all of
the habitual criminal's prior felony convictions are also violations of
such subsection or sections or of a similar statute in another state or
of the United States, the mandatory minimum term shall be three years and
the maximum term not more than twenty years; and
(d) If a greater punishment is otherwise provided by statute, the
law creating the greater punishment shall govern.
(2) When punishment of an accused as a habitual criminal is sought,
the facts with reference thereto shall be charged in the indictment or
information which contains the charge of the felony upon which the
accused is prosecuted, but the fact that the accused is charged with
being a habitual criminal shall not be an issue upon the trial of the
felony charge and shall not in any manner be disclosed to the jury. If
the accused is convicted of a felony, before sentence is imposed a
hearing shall be had before the court alone as to whether such person has
been previously convicted of prior felonies. The court shall fix a time
for the hearing and notice thereof shall be given to the accused at least
three days prior thereto. At the hearing, if the court finds from the
evidence submitted that the accused has been convicted two or more times
of felonies and sentences imposed therefor by the courts of this or any
other state or by the United States, the court shall sentence such person
so convicted as a habitual criminal.
(3) If the person so convicted shows to the satisfaction of the
court before which the conviction was had that he or she was released
from imprisonment upon either of such sentences upon a pardon granted for
the reason that he or she was innocent, such conviction and sentence
shall not be considered as such under this section and section 29-2222.
Sec. 12. Section 84-941.01, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
-18-

LB1169 LB1169
2026 2026
amended to read:
84-941.01 Potentially disqualifying conviction includes a conviction
for:
(1) Criminal attempt as provided in section 28-201, conspiracy as
provided in section 28-202, or aiding and abetting as provided in section
28-206, to commit an offense listed in this section;
(2) Murder as provided in sections 28-303 or 28-304;
(3) Manslaughter as provided in section 28-305;
(4) Motor vehicle homicide as provided in section 28-306;
(5) Assault in the first or second degree as provided in sections
28-308 and 28-309;
(6) Terroristic threats as provided in section 28-311.01;
(7) Stalking as provided in section 28-311.03;
(8) Kidnapping as provided in section 28-313;
(9) False imprisonment as provided in sections 28-314 and 28-315;
(10) A sexual act subject to criminal penalties as provided in
sections 28-317 to 28-322.05;
(11) Domestic assault as provided in section 28-323;
(12) Robbery as provided in section 28-324;
(13) Arson as provided in sections 28-502, 28-503, and 28-504;
(14) Fraud subject to criminal penalties as provided in sections
28-505, 28-631, 28-638, 28-639, 28-640, and 28-935;
(15) Theft as provided in sections 28-511, 28-512, 28-513, and
28-515;
(16) Forgery as provided in sections 28-602 and 28-603;
(17) Incest as provided in section 28-703;
(18) Child abuse as provided in section 28-707;
(19) Human trafficking, labor trafficking, sex trafficking, labor
trafficking of a minor, or sex trafficking of a minor as provided in
section 28-831;
(20) False reporting as provided in section 28-907;
-19-

LB1169 LB1169
2026 2026
(21) Perjury as provided in section 28-915;
(22) Assault on a public safety officer or health care professional
in the first degree, section 4 of this act; an officer, an emergency
responder, certain employees, or a health care professional in the first
degree as provided in section 28-929;
(23) Assault on a public safety officer or health care professional
in the second degree, section 5 of this act; an officer, an emergency
responder, certain employees, or a health care professional in the second
degree as provided in section 28-930;
(24) Assault on a public safety officer or health care professional
in the third degree, section 6 of this act; an officer, an emergency
responder, certain employees, or a health care professional in the third
degree as provided in section 28-931;
(25) Assault on an officer, an emergency responder, certain
employees, or a health care professional using a motor vehicle as
provided in section 28-931.01;
(25) (26) An offense that has as an element the threat to inflict
serious bodily injury as defined in section 28-109 or death on another
person, the intentional infliction of serious bodily injury as defined in
section 28-109 on another person, or intentionally causing the death of
another person;
(26) (27) An offense for which registration is required under the
Sex Offender Registration Act; or
(27) (28) Any offense under the laws of another jurisdiction that is
substantially equivalent to any of the offenses listed in this section.
Sec. 13. Original section 84-941.01, Reissue Revised Statutes of
Nebraska, sections 28-115, 28-929, 28-929.01, 28-929.02, 28-930, 28-931,
28-934, and 28-1351, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 2024, and
sections 28-101, 28-1354, and 29-2221, Revised Statutes Supplement, 2025,
are repealed.
Sec. 14. The following section is outright repealed: Section
-20-

LB1169 LB1169
2026 2026
28-931.01, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 2024.
-21-